Hawaii statutes.
§440G-8.1 Requirement for adequate service;
terms and conditions of service. (a) Every cable operator shall provide
safe, adequate, and reliable service in accordance with applicable laws, rules,
franchise requirements, and its filed schedule of terms and conditions of
service.

(b) The director shall require each cable
operator to submit a schedule of all terms and conditions of service in the
form and with the notice that the director may prescribe.

(c) The director shall ensure that the terms
and conditions upon which cable service is provided are fair both to the public
and to the cable operator, taking into account the geographic, topographic, and
economic characteristics of the service area and the economics of providing
cable service to subscribers in the service area. [L 1987, c 301, pt of §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next